Illinois, session 104th, SB2208.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-501 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-501)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-501)7    Sec. 11-501. Driving while under the influence of alcohol, 8other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 9combination thereof. 10    (a) A person shall not drive or be in actual physical 11control of any vehicle within this State while:12        (1) the alcohol concentration in the person's blood, 13    other bodily substance, or breath is 0.08 or more based on 14    the definition of blood and breath units in Section 15    11-501.2, or, for persons who qualify under paragraphs (4) 16    and (5) of subsection (c), the alcohol concentration in 17    the person's blood, other bodily substance, or breath is 18    0.04 or more during the required time period;19        (2) under the influence of alcohol;20        (3) under the influence of any intoxicating compound 21    or combination of intoxicating compounds to a degree that 22    renders the person incapable of driving safely;23        (4) under the influence of any other drug or   SB2208- 2 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1    combination of drugs to a degree that renders the person 2    incapable of safely driving;3        (5) under the combined influence of alcohol, other 4    drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds to a 5    degree that renders the person incapable of safely 6    driving;7        (6) there is any amount of a drug, substance, or 8    compound in the person's breath, blood, other bodily 9    substance, or urine resulting from the unlawful use or 10    consumption of a controlled substance listed in the 11    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating 12    compound listed in the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, 13    or methamphetamine as listed in the Methamphetamine 14    Control and Community Protection Act; or15        (7) the person has, within 2 hours of driving or being 16    in actual physical control of a vehicle, a 17    tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in the person's whole 18    blood or other bodily substance as defined in paragraph 6 19    of subsection (a) of Section 11-501.2 of this Code. 20    Subject to all other requirements and provisions under 21    this Section, this paragraph (7) does not apply to the 22    lawful consumption of cannabis by a qualifying patient 23    licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 24    Program Act who is in possession of a valid registry card 25    issued under that Act, unless that person is impaired by 26    the use of cannabis.  SB2208- 3 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1    (b) The fact that any person charged with violating this 2Section is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol, 3cannabis under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 4Program Act, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 5compounds, or any combination thereof, shall not constitute a 6defense against any charge of violating this Section.7    (c) Penalties.8        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, any 9    person convicted of violating subsection (a) of this 10    Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.11        (2) A person who violates subsection (a) or a similar 12    provision a second time shall be sentenced to a mandatory 13    minimum term of either 5 days of imprisonment or 240 hours 14    of community service in addition to any other criminal or 15    administrative sanction.16        (3) A person who violates subsection (a) is subject to 17    6 months of imprisonment, an additional mandatory minimum 18    fine of $1,000, and 25 days of community service in a 19    program benefiting children if the person was transporting 20    a person under the age of 16 at the time of the violation.21        (4) A person who violates subsection (a) a first time, 22    if the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, breath, 23    other bodily substance, or urine was 0.15 0.16 or more 24    based on the definition of blood, breath, other bodily 25    substance, or urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be 26    subject, in addition to any other penalty that may be   SB2208- 4 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1    imposed, to a mandatory minimum of 100 hours of community 2    service and a mandatory minimum fine of $500. For one year 3    after the person's conviction for a violation that 4    qualifies under this subparagraph (4), the person shall 5    have a limit of an alcohol concentration in his or her 6    blood, breath, other bodily substance, or urine of 0.04. 7        (5) A person who violates subsection (a) a second 8    time, if at the time of the second violation the alcohol 9    concentration in his or her blood, breath, other bodily 10    substance, or urine was 0.15 0.16 or more based on the 11    definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 12    urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 13    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 14    mandatory minimum of 2 days of imprisonment and a 15    mandatory minimum fine of $1,250. For 5 years after the 16    person's conviction for a violation that qualifies under 17    this subparagraph (5), the person shall have a limit of an 18    alcohol concentration in his or her blood, breath, other 19    bodily substance, or urine of 0.04. 20    (d) Aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, 21other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or 22any combination thereof. 23        (1) Every person convicted of committing a violation 24    of this Section shall be guilty of aggravated driving 25    under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 26    intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination   SB2208- 5 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1    thereof if:2            (A) the person committed a violation of subsection 3        (a) or a similar provision for the third or subsequent 4        time;5            (B) the person committed a violation of subsection 6        (a) while driving a school bus with one or more 7        passengers on board;8            (C) the person in committing a violation of 9        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 10        that resulted in great bodily harm or permanent 11        disability or disfigurement to another, when the 12        violation was a proximate cause of the injuries;13            (D) the person committed a violation of subsection 14        (a) and has been previously convicted of violating 15        Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 16        Criminal Code of 2012 or a similar provision of a law 17        of another state relating to reckless homicide in 18        which the person was determined to have been under the 19        influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 20        intoxicating compound or compounds as an element of 21        the offense or the person has previously been 22        convicted under subparagraph (C) or subparagraph (F) 23        of this paragraph (1);24            (E) the person, in committing a violation of 25        subsection (a) while driving at any speed in a school 26        speed zone at a time when a speed limit of 20 miles per   SB2208- 6 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1        hour was in effect under subsection (a) of Section 2        11-605 of this Code, was involved in a motor vehicle 3        crash that resulted in bodily harm, other than great 4        bodily harm or permanent disability or disfigurement, 5        to another person, when the violation of subsection 6        (a) was a proximate cause of the bodily harm;7            (F) the person, in committing a violation of 8        subsection (a), was involved in a motor vehicle crash 9        or snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle, or watercraft 10        accident that resulted in the death of another person, 11        when the violation of subsection (a) was a proximate 12        cause of the death;13            (G) the person committed a violation of subsection 14        (a) during a period in which the defendant's driving 15        privileges are revoked or suspended, where the 16        revocation or suspension was for a violation of 17        subsection (a) or a similar provision, Section 18        11-501.1, paragraph (b) of Section 11-401, or for 19        reckless homicide as defined in Section 9-3 of the 20        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;21            (H) the person committed the violation while he or 22        she did not possess a driver's license or permit or a 23        restricted driving permit or a judicial driving permit 24        or a monitoring device driving permit;25            (I) the person committed the violation while he or 26        she knew or should have known that the vehicle he or   SB2208- 7 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1        she was driving was not covered by a liability 2        insurance policy;3            (J) the person in committing a violation of 4        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 5        that resulted in bodily harm, but not great bodily 6        harm, to the child under the age of 16 being 7        transported by the person, if the violation was the 8        proximate cause of the injury; 9            (K) the person in committing a second violation of 10        subsection (a) or a similar provision was transporting 11        a person under the age of 16; or12            (L) the person committed a violation of subsection 13        (a) of this Section while transporting one or more 14        passengers in a vehicle for-hire. 15        (2)(A) Except as provided otherwise, a person 16    convicted of aggravated driving under the influence of 17    alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 18    compounds, or any combination thereof is guilty of a Class 19    4 felony.20        (B) A third violation of this Section or a similar 21    provision is a Class 2 felony. If at the time of the third 22    violation the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, 23    breath, other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more 24    based on the definition of blood, breath, other bodily 25    substance, or urine units in Section 11-501.2, a mandatory 26    minimum of 90 days of imprisonment and a mandatory minimum   SB2208- 8 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1    fine of $2,500 shall be imposed in addition to any other 2    criminal or administrative sanction. If at the time of the 3    third violation, the defendant was transporting a person 4    under the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 5    days of community service in a program benefiting children 6    shall be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 7    administrative sanction.8        (C) A fourth violation of this Section or a similar 9    provision is a Class 2 felony, for which a sentence of 10    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 11    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in 12    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 13    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 14    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 15    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 16    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 17    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fourth 18    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 19    the age of 16 a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of 20    community service in a program benefiting children shall 21    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 22    administrative sanction.23        (D) A fifth violation of this Section or a similar 24    provision is a Class 1 felony, for which a sentence of 25    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 26    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in   SB2208- 9 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 2    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 3    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 4    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 5    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 6    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fifth 7    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 8    the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000, and 25 days of 9    community service in a program benefiting children shall 10    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 11    administrative sanction.12        (E) A sixth or subsequent violation of this Section or 13    similar provision is a Class X felony. If at the time of 14    the violation, the alcohol concentration in the 15    defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 16    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 17    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 18    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 19    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 20    administrative sanction. If at the time of the violation, 21    the defendant was transporting a person under the age of 22    16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of community 23    service in a program benefiting children shall be imposed 24    in addition to any other criminal or administrative 25    sanction.26        (F) For a violation of subparagraph (C) of paragraph   SB2208- 10 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1    (1) of this subsection (d), the defendant, if sentenced to 2    a term of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to not less 3    than one year nor more than 12 years.4        (G) A violation of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) 5    of this subsection (d) is a Class 2 felony, for which the 6    defendant, unless the court determines that extraordinary 7    circumstances exist and require probation, shall be 8    sentenced to: (i) a term of imprisonment of not less than 3 9    years and not more than 14 years if the violation resulted 10    in the death of one person; or (ii) a term of imprisonment 11    of not less than 6 years and not more than 28 years if the 12    violation resulted in the deaths of 2 or more persons.13        (H) For a violation of subparagraph (J) of paragraph 14    (1) of this subsection (d), a mandatory fine of $2,500, 15    and 25 days of community service in a program benefiting 16    children shall be imposed in addition to any other 17    criminal or administrative sanction.18        (I) A violation of subparagraph (K) of paragraph (1) 19    of this subsection (d), is a Class 2 felony and a mandatory 20    fine of $2,500, and 25 days of community service in a 21    program benefiting children shall be imposed in addition 22    to any other criminal or administrative sanction. If the 23    child being transported suffered bodily harm, but not 24    great bodily harm, in a motor vehicle crash, and the 25    violation was the proximate cause of that injury, a 26    mandatory fine of $5,000 and 25 days of community service   SB2208- 11 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1    in a program benefiting children shall be imposed in 2    addition to any other criminal or administrative sanction.3        (J) A violation of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) 4    of this subsection (d) is a Class 3 felony, for which a 5    sentence of probation or conditional discharge may not be 6    imposed. 7        (3) Any person sentenced under this subsection (d) who 8    receives a term of probation or conditional discharge must 9    serve a minimum term of either 480 hours of community 10    service or 10 days of imprisonment as a condition of the 11    probation or conditional discharge in addition to any 12    other criminal or administrative sanction.13    (e) Any reference to a prior violation of subsection (a) 14or a similar provision includes any violation of a provision 15of a local ordinance or a provision of a law of another state 16or an offense committed on a military installation that is 17similar to a violation of subsection (a) of this Section.18    (f) The imposition of a mandatory term of imprisonment or 19assignment of community service for a violation of this 20Section shall not be suspended or reduced by the court.21    (g) Any penalty imposed for driving with a license that 22has been revoked for a previous violation of subsection (a) of 23this Section shall be in addition to the penalty imposed for 24any subsequent violation of subsection (a).25    (h) For any prosecution under this Section, a certified 26copy of the driving abstract of the defendant shall be   SB2208- 12 -LRB104 09371 LNS 19430 b1admitted as proof of any prior conviction. 2(Source: P.A. 101-363, eff. 8-9-19; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.)